Hawaii statutes.
[§658H-6] Exceptions to privilege. (a)
There is no privilege under section 658H-4 for a mediation communication that
is:

(1) In an agreement evidenced by a record signed by
all parties to the agreement;

(2) Available to the public under chapter 92F or made
during a session of a mediation that is open, or is required by law to be open,
to the public;

(3) A threat or statement of a plan to inflict bodily
injury or commit a crime of violence;

(4) Intentionally used to plan a crime, attempt to
commit or commit a crime, or to conceal an ongoing crime or ongoing criminal
activity;

(5) Sought or offered to prove or disprove a claim or
complaint of professional misconduct or malpractice filed against a mediator;

(6) Except as provided in subsection (c), sought or
offered to prove or disprove a claim or complaint of professional misconduct or
malpractice filed against a mediation party, nonparty participant, or
representative of a party based on conduct occurring during a mediation; or

(7) Sought or offered to prove or disprove abuse,
neglect, abandonment, or exploitation in a proceeding in which a child or adult
protective services agency is a party, unless the department of human services
participates in the mediation.

(b) There is no privilege under section 658H-4
if a court, administrative agency, or arbitrator finds, after a hearing in
camera, that the party seeking discovery or the proponent of the evidence has
shown that the evidence is not otherwise available, that there is a need for
the evidence that substantially outweighs the interest in protecting
confidentiality, and that the mediation communication is sought or offered in:

(1) A court proceeding involving a felony or
misdemeanor; or

(2) Except as provided in subsection (c), a
proceeding to prove a claim to rescind or reform, or a defense to avoid,
liability on a contract arising out of the mediation.

(c) A mediator shall not be compelled to
provide evidence of a mediation communication referred to in subsection (a)(6)
or (b)(2).

(d) If a mediation communication is not
privileged under subsection (a) or (b), only the portion of the mediation
communication necessary for the application of the exception from nondisclosure
may be admitted. Admission of evidence under subsection (a) or (b) does not
render the evidence, or any other mediation communication, discoverable or
admissible for any other purpose. [L 2013, c 284, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next